Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2394.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 42-5075, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5075. Prime contracting classification; exemptions; definitions A. The prime contracting classification is comprised of the business of prime contracting and the business of manufactured building dealer.  Sales for resale to another manufactured building dealer are not subject to tax. Sales for resale do not include sales to a lessor of manufactured buildings. The sale of a used manufactured building is not taxable under this chapter. The prime contracting classification does not include any work or operation performed by a person that is not required to be licensed by the registrar of contractors pursuant to section 32-1121. B. The tax base for the prime contracting classification is sixty-five percent of the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the business. The following amounts shall be deducted from the gross proceeds of sales or gross income before computing the tax base: 1. The sales price of land, which shall not exceed the fair market value. 2. Sales and installation of groundwater measuring devices required under section 45-604 and groundwater monitoring wells required by law, including monitoring wells installed for acquiring information for a permit required by law. 3. The sales price of furniture, furnishings, fixtures, appliances and attachments that are not incorporated as component parts of or attached to a manufactured building or the setup site. The sale of such items may be subject to the taxes imposed by article 1 of this chapter separately and distinctly from the sale of the manufactured building. 4. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income received from a contract entered into for the modification of any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation, manufactured building or other structure, project, development or improvement located in a military reuse zone for providing aviation or aerospace services or for a manufacturer, assembler or fabricator of aviation or aerospace products within an active military reuse zone after the zone is initially established or renewed under section 42-1301. To be eligible to qualify for this deduction, before beginning work under the contract, the prime contractor must have applied for a letter of qualification from the department of revenue. 5. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from a contract to construct a qualified environmental technology manufacturing, producing or processing facility, as described in section 41-1514.02, and from subsequent construction and installation contracts that begin within ten years after the start of initial construction. To qualify for this deduction, before beginning work under the contract, the prime contractor must obtain a letter of qualification from the department of revenue. This paragraph shall apply for ten full consecutive calendar or fiscal years after the start of initial construction. 6. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income from a contract to provide for one or more of the following actions, or a contract for site preparation, constructing, furnishing or installing machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property, including structures necessary to protect exempt incorporated materials or installed machinery or equipment, and tangible personal property incorporated into the project, to perform one or more of the following actions in response to a release or suspected release of a hazardous substance, pollutant or contaminant from a facility to the environment, unless the release was authorized by a permit issued by a governmental authority: (a) Actions to monitor, assess and evaluate such a release or a suspected release. (b) Excavation, removal and transportation of contaminated soil and its treatment or disposal. (c) Treatment of contaminated soil by vapor extraction, chemical or physical stabilization, soil washing or biological treatment to reduce the concentration, toxicity or mobility of a contaminant. (d) Pumping and treatment or in situ treatment of contaminated groundwater or surface water to reduce the concentration or toxicity of a contaminant. (e) The installation of structures, such as cutoff walls or caps, to contain contaminants present in groundwater or soil and prevent them from reaching a location where they could threaten human health or welfare or the environment. This paragraph does not include asbestos removal or the construction or use of ancillary structures such as maintenance sheds, offices or storage facilities for unattached equipment, pollution control equipment, facilities or other control items required or to be used by a person to prevent or control contamination before it reaches the environment. 7. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income that is derived from a contract for the installation, assembly, repair or maintenance of machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property that is either deducted from the tax base of the retail classification under section 42-5061, subsection B or that is exempt from use tax under section 42-5159, subsection B and that has independent functional utility, pursuant to the following provisions: (a) The deduction provided in this paragraph includes the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from all of the following: (i) Any activity performed on machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property with independent functional utility. (ii) Any activity performed on any tangible personal property relating to machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property with independent functional utility in furtherance of any of the purposes provided for under subdivision (d) of this paragraph. (iii) Any activity that is related to the activities described in items (i) and (ii) of this subdivision, including inspecting the installation of or testing the machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property. (b) The deduction provided in this paragraph does not include gross proceeds of sales or gross income from the portion of any contracting activity that consists of the development of, or modification to, real property in order to facilitate the installation, assembly, repair, maintenance or removal of machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property that is either deducted from the tax base of the retail classification under section 42-5061, subsection B or exempt from use tax under section 42-5159, subsection B. (c) The deduction provided in this paragraph shall be determined without regard to the size or useful life of the machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property. (d) For the purposes of this paragraph, "independent functional utility" means that the machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property can independently perform its function without attachment to real property, other than attachment for any of the following purposes: (i) Assembling the machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property. (ii) Connecting items of machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property to each other. (iii) Connecting the machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property, whether as an individual item or as a system of items, to water, power, gas, communication or other services. (iv) Stabilizing or protecting the machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property during operation by bolting, burying or performing other similar nonpermanent connections to either real property or real property improvements. 8. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income attributable to the purchase of machinery, equipment or other tangible personal property that is exempt from or deductible from transaction privilege and use tax under: (a) Section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraph 25, 29 or 58. (b) Section 42-5061, subsection B. (c) Section 42-5159, subsection A, paragraph 13, subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (j), (k), (m) or (n) or paragraph 55. (d) Section 42-5159, subsection B. 9. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income received from a contract for the construction of an environmentally controlled facility for the raising of poultry for the production of eggs and the sorting, cooling and packaging of eggs. 10. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income that is derived from a contract entered into with a person who is engaged in the commercial production of livestock, livestock products or agricultural, horticultural, viticultural or floricultural crops or products in this state for the modification of any building, highway, road, excavation, manufactured building or other structure, project, development or improvement used directly and primarily to prevent, monitor, control or reduce air, water or land pollution. 11. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income that is derived from the installation, assembly, repair or maintenance of clean rooms that are deducted from the tax base of the retail classification pursuant to section 42-5061, subsection B, paragraph 17. 12. For taxable periods beginning from and after June 30, 2001, the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from a contract entered into for the construction of a residential apartment housing facility that qualifies for a federal housing subsidy for low-income persons over sixty-two years of age and that is owned by a nonprofit charitable organization that has qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code. 13. For taxable periods beginning from and after December 31, 1996 and ending before January 1, 2017, the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from a contract to provide and install a solar energy device. The contractor shall register with the department as a solar energy contractor. By registering, the contractor acknowledges that it will make its books and records relating to sales of solar energy devices available to the department for examination. 14. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from a contract entered into for the construction of a launch site, as defined in 14 Code of Federal Regulations section 401.5. 15. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from a contract entered into for the construction of a domestic violence shelter that is owned and operated by a nonprofit charitable organization that has qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code. 16. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from contracts to perform postconstruction treatment of real property for termite and general pest control, including wood-destroying organisms. 17. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income received from contracts entered into before July 1, 2006 for constructing a state university research infrastructure project if the project has been reviewed by the joint committee on capital review before the university enters into the construction contract for the project. For the purposes of this paragraph, "research infrastructure" has the same meaning prescribed in section 15-1670. 18. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income received from a contract for the construction of any building, or other structure, project, development or improvement owned by a qualified business under section 41-1516 for harvesting or processing qualifying forest products removed from qualifying projects as defined in section 41-1516 if actual construction begins before January 1, 2024. To qualify for this deduction, the prime contractor must obtain a letter of qualification from the Arizona commerce authority before beginning work under the contract. 19. Any amount of the gross proceeds of sales or gross income attributable to development fees that are incurred in relation to a contract for construction, development or improvement of real property and that are paid by a prime contractor or subcontractor. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) The attributable amount shall not exceed the value of the development fees actually imposed. (b) The attributable amount is equal to the total amount of development fees paid by the prime contractor or subcontractor, and the total development fees credited in exchange for the construction of, contribution to or dedication of real property for providing public infrastructure, public safety or other public services necessary to the development. The real property must be the subject of the development fees. (c) "Development fees" means fees imposed to offset capital costs of providing public infrastructure, public safety or other public services to a development and authorized pursuant to section 9-463.05, section 11-1102 or title 48 regardless of the jurisdiction to which the fees are paid. 20. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from a contract entered into for the construction of a mixed waste processing facility that is located on a municipal solid waste landfill and that is constructed for the purpose of recycling solid waste or producing renewable energy from landfill waste. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Mixed waste processing facility" means a solid waste facility that is owned, operated or used for the treatment, processing or disposal of solid waste, recyclable solid waste, very small quantity generator waste or household hazardous waste. For the purposes of this subdivision, "very small quantity generator waste", "household hazardous waste" and "solid waste facility" have the same meanings prescribed in section 49-701, except that solid waste facility does include a site that stores, treats or processes paper, glass, wood, cardboard, household textiles, scrap metal, plastic, vegetative waste, aluminum, steel or other recyclable material. (b) "Municipal solid waste landfill" has the same meaning prescribed in section 49-701. (c) "Recycling" means collecting, separating, cleansing, treating and reconstituting recyclable solid waste that would otherwise become solid waste, but does not include incineration or other similar processes. (d) "Renewable energy" means usable energy, including electricity, fuels, gas and heat, produced through the conversion of energy provided by sunlight, water, wind, geothermal, heat, biomass, biogas, landfill gas or another nonfossil renewable resource. 21. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from a contract to install containment structures. For the purposes of this paragraph, "containment structure" means a structure that prevents, monitors, controls or reduces noxious or harmful discharge into the environment. C. Entitlement to the deduction pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 7 of this section is subject to the following provisions: 1. A prime contractor may establish entitlement to the deduction by both: (a) Marking the invoice for the transaction to indicate that the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the transaction was deducted from the base. (b) Obtaining a certificate executed by the purchaser indicating the name and address of the purchaser, the precise nature of the business of the purchaser, the purpose for which the purchase was made, the necessary facts to establish the deductibility of the property under section 42-5061, subsection B, and a certification that the person executing the certificate is authorized to do so on behalf of the purchaser. The certificate may be disregarded if the prime contractor has reason to believe that the information contained in the certificate is not accurate or complete. 2. A person who does not comply with paragraph 1 of this subsection may establish entitlement to the deduction by presenting facts necessary to support the entitlement, but the burden of proof is on that person. 3. The department may prescribe a form for the certificate described in paragraph 1, subdivision (b) of this subsection. The department may also adopt rules that describe the transactions with respect to which a person is not entitled to rely solely on the information contained in the certificate provided in paragraph 1, subdivision (b) of this subsection but must instead obtain such additional information as required in order to be entitled to the deduction. 4. If a prime contractor is entitled to a deduction by complying with paragraph 1 of this subsection, the department may require the purchaser who caused the execution of the certificate to establish the accuracy and completeness of the information required to be contained in the certificate that would entitle the prime contractor to the deduction.  If the purchaser cannot establish the accuracy and completeness of the information, the purchaser is liable in an amount equal to any tax, penalty and interest that the prime contractor would have been required to pay under article 1 of this chapter if the prime contractor had not complied with paragraph 1 of this subsection. Payment of the amount under this paragraph exempts the purchaser from liability for any tax imposed under article 4 of this chapter. The amount shall be treated as a transaction privilege tax to the purchaser and as tax revenues collected from the prime contractor in order to designate the distribution base for purposes of section 42-5029. D. Subcontractors or others who perform modification activities are not subject to tax if they can demonstrate that the job was within the control of a prime contractor or contractors or a dealership of manufactured buildings and that the prime contractor or dealership is liable for the tax on the gross income, gross proceeds of sales or gross receipts attributable to the job and from which the subcontractors or others were paid. E. Amounts received by a contractor for a project are excluded from the contractor's gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the business if the person who hired the contractor executes and provides a certificate to the contractor stating that the person providing the certificate is a prime contractor and is liable for the tax under article 1 of this chapter. The department shall prescribe the form of the certificate.  If the contractor has reason to believe that the information contained on the certificate is erroneous or incomplete, the department may disregard the certificate. If the person who provides the certificate is not liable for the tax as a prime contractor, that person is nevertheless deemed to be the prime contractor in lieu of the contractor and is subject to the tax under this section on the gross receipts or gross proceeds received by the contractor. F. Every person engaging or continuing in this state in the business of prime contracting or dealership of manufactured buildings shall present to the purchaser of such prime contracting or manufactured building a written receipt of the gross income or gross proceeds of sales from such activity and shall separately state the taxes to be paid pursuant to this section. G. For the purposes of section 42-5032.01, the department shall separately account for revenues collected under the prime contracting classification from any prime contractor engaged in the preparation or construction of a multipurpose facility, and related infrastructure, that is owned, operated or leased by the tourism and sports authority pursuant to title 5, chapter 8. H. For the purposes of section 42-5032.02, from and after September 30, 2013, the department shall separately account for revenues reported and collected under the prime contracting classification from any prime contractor engaged in the construction of any buildings and associated improvements that are for the benefit of a manufacturing facility. For the purposes of this subsection, "associated improvements" and "manufacturing facility" have the same meanings prescribed in section 42-5032.02. I. For the purposes of section 42-5032.03 and subject to section 48-4238, beginning October 1, 2025 and each month thereafter through  December 31, 2055, the department shall separately account for revenues reported and collected under the prime contracting classification from any prime contractor engaged in the construction of any buildings and associated improvements that are for the benefit of a major league baseball facility or an adjacent building that is owned by a county stadium district pursuant to title 48, chapter 26 and operated by the county stadium district or the professional baseball franchise organization that occupies the major league baseball facility or adjacent building. For the purposes of this subsection, "adjacent building" and "major league baseball facility" have the same meanings prescribed in section 48-4201. J. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from a contract for lawn maintenance services is not subject to tax under this section if the contract does not include landscaping activities. Lawn maintenance service is a service pursuant to section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraph 1, and includes lawn mowing and edging, weeding, repairing sprinkler heads or drip irrigation heads, seasonal replacement of flowers, refreshing gravel, lawn dethatching, seeding winter lawns, leaf and debris collection and removal, tree or shrub pruning or clipping, garden and gravel raking and applying pesticides, as defined in section 3-361, and fertilizer materials, as defined in section 3-262. K. Except as provided in subsection P of this section, the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from landscaping activities is subject to tax under this section. Landscaping includes installing lawns, grading or leveling ground, installing gravel or boulders, planting trees and other plants, felling trees, removing or mulching tree stumps, removing other imbedded plants, building irrigation berms, installing railroad ties and installing underground sprinkler or watering systems. L. The portion of gross proceeds of sales or gross income attributable to the actual direct costs of providing architectural or engineering services that are incorporated in a contract is not subject to tax under this section. For the purposes of this subsection, "direct costs" means the portion of the actual costs that are directly expended in providing architectural or engineering services. M. Operating a landfill or a solid waste disposal facility is not subject to taxation under this section, including filling, compacting and creating vehicle access to and from cell sites within the landfill.  Constructing roads to a landfill or solid waste disposal facility and constructing cells within a landfill or solid waste disposal facility may be deemed prime contracting under this section. N. The following apply in determining the taxable situs of sales of manufactured buildings: 1. For sales in this state where the manufactured building dealer contracts to deliver the building to a setup site or to perform the setup in this state, the taxable situs is the setup site. 2. For sales in this state where the manufactured building dealer does not contract to deliver the building to a setup site or does not perform the setup, the taxable situs is the location of the dealership where the building is delivered to the buyer. 3. For sales in this state where the manufactured building dealer contracts to deliver the building to a setup site that is outside this state, the situs is outside this state and the transaction is excluded from tax. O. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income attributable to a written contract for design phase services or professional services, executed before modification begins and with terms, conditions and pricing of all of these services separately stated in the contract from those for construction phase services, is not subject to tax under this section, regardless of whether the services are provided sequential to or concurrent with prime contracting activities that are subject to tax under this section. This subsection does not include the gross proceeds of sales or gross income attributable to construction phase services. For the purposes of this subsection: 1. "Construction phase services" means services for the execution and completion of any modification, including the following: (a) Administration or supervision of any modification performed on the project, including team management and coordination, scheduling, cost controls, submittal process management, field management, safety program, close-out process and warranty period services. (b) Administration or supervision of any modification performed pursuant to a punch list. For the purposes of this subdivision, "punch list" means minor items of modification work performed after substantial completion and before final completion of the project. (c) Administration or supervision of any modification performed pursuant to change orders. For the purposes of this subdivision, "change order" means a written instrument issued after execution of a contract for modification work, providing for all of the following: (i) The scope of a change in the modification work, contract for modification work or other contract documents. (ii) The amount of an adjustment, if any, to the guaranteed maximum price as set in the contract for modification work. For the purposes of this item, "guaranteed maximum price" means the amount guaranteed to be the maximum amount due to a prime contractor for the performance of all modification work for the project. (iii) The extent of an adjustment, if any, to the contract time of performance set forth in the contract. (d) Administration or supervision of any modification performed pursuant to change directives. For the purposes of this subdivision, "change directive" means a written order directing a change in modification work before agreement on an adjustment of the guaranteed maximum price or contract time. (e) Inspection to determine the dates of substantial completion or final completion. (f) Preparation of any manuals, warranties, as-built drawings, spares or other items the prime contractor must furnish pursuant to the contract for modification work. For the purposes of this subdivision, "as-built drawing" means a drawing that indicates field changes made to adapt to field conditions, field changes resulting from change orders or buried and concealed installation of piping, conduit and utility services. (g) Preparation of status reports after modification work has begun detailing the progress of work performed, including preparation of any of the following: (i) Master schedule updates. (ii) Modification work cash flow projection updates. (iii) Site reports made on a periodic basis. (iv) Identification of discrepancies, conflicts or ambiguities in modification work documents that require resolution. (v) Identification of any health and safety issues that have arisen in connection with the modification work. (h) Preparation of daily logs of modification work, including documentation of personnel, weather conditions and on-site occurrences. (i) Preparation of any submittals or shop drawings used by the prime contractor to illustrate details of the modification work performed. (j) Administration or supervision of any other activities for which a prime contractor receives a certificate for payment or certificate for final payment based on the progress of modification work performed on the project. 2. "Design phase services" means services for developing and completing a design for a project that are not construction phase services, including the following: (a) Evaluating surveys, reports, test results or any other information on-site conditions for the project, including physical characteristics, legal limitations and utility locations for the site. (b) Evaluating any criteria or programming objectives for the project to ascertain requirements for the project, such as physical requirements affecting cost or projected utilization of the project. (c) Preparing drawings and specifications for architectural program documents, schematic design documents, design development documents, modification work documents or documents that identify the scope of or materials for the project. (d) Preparing an initial schedule for the project, excluding the preparation of updates to the master schedule after modification work has begun. (e) Preparing preliminary estimates of costs of modification work before completion of the final design of the project, including an estimate or schedule of values for any of the following: (i) Labor, materials, machinery and equipment, tools, water, heat, utilities, transportation and other facilities and services used in the execution and completion of modification work, regardless of whether they are temporary or permanent or whether they are incorporated in the modifications. (ii) The cost of labor and materials to be furnished by the owner of the real property. (iii) The cost of any equipment of the owner of the real property to be assigned by the owner to the prime contractor. (iv) The cost of any labor for installation of equipment separately provided by the owner of the real property that has been designed, specified, selected or specifically provided for in any design document for the project. (v) Any fee paid by the owner of the real property to the prime contractor pursuant to the contract for modification work. (vi) Any bond and insurance premiums. (vii) Any applicable taxes. (viii) Any contingency fees for the prime contractor that may be used before final completion of the project. (f) Reviewing and evaluating cost estimates and project documents to prepare recommendations on site use, site improvements, selection of materials, building systems and equipment, modification feasibility, availability of materials and labor, local modification activity as related to schedules and time requirements for modification work. (g) Preparing the plan and procedures for selection of subcontractors, including any prequalification of subcontractor candidates. 3. "Professional services" means architect services, engineer services, geologist services, land surveying services or landscape architect services that are within the scope of those services as provided in title 32, chapter 1 and for which gross proceeds of sales or gross income has not otherwise been deducted under subsection L of this section. P. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from a contract with the owner of real property or improvements to real property for the maintenance, repair, replacement or alteration of existing property is not subject to tax under this section if the contract does not include modification activities, except as specified in this subsection.  The gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from a de minimis amount of modification activity does not subject the contract or any part of the contract to tax under this section. For the purposes of this subsection: 1. Tangible personal property that is incorporated or fabricated into a project described in this subsection may be subject to the amount prescribed in section 42-5008.01. 2. Each contract is independent of any other contract, except that any change order that directly relates to the scope of work of the original contract shall be treated the same as the original contract under this chapter, regardless of the amount of modification activities included in the change order. If a change order does not directly relate to the scope of work of the original contract, the change order shall be treated as a new contract, with the tax treatment of any subsequent change order to follow the tax treatment of the contract to which the scope of work of the subsequent change order directly relates. Q. Notwithstanding subsection P of this section, a contract that primarily involves surface or subsurface improvements to land and that is subject to title 28, chapter 19, 20 or 22 or title 34, chapter 2 or 6 is taxable under this section, even if the contract also includes vertical improvements. Agencies that are subject to procurement processes under those provisions shall include in the request for proposals a notice to bidders when those projects are subject to this section. This subsection does not apply to contracts with: 1. Community facilities districts, fire districts, county television improvement districts, community park maintenance districts, cotton pest control districts, hospital districts, pest abatement districts, health service districts, agricultural improvement districts, county free library districts, county jail districts, county stadium districts, special health care districts, public health services districts, theme park districts or revitalization districts. 2. Any special taxing district not specified in paragraph 1 of this subsection if the district does not substantially engage in the modification, maintenance, repair, replacement or alteration of surface or subsurface improvements to land. R. Notwithstanding subsection S, paragraph 10 of this section, a person owning real property who enters into a contract for sale of the real property, who is responsible to the new owner of the property for modifications made to the property in the period subsequent to the transfer of title and who receives a consideration for the modifications is considered a prime contractor solely for purposes of taxing the gross proceeds of sale or gross income received for the modifications made subsequent to the transfer of title. The original owner's gross proceeds of sale or gross income received for the modifications shall be determined according to the following methodology: 1. If any part of the contract for sale of the property specifies amounts to be paid to the original owner for the modifications to be made in the period subsequent to the transfer of title, the amounts are included in the original owner's gross proceeds of sale or gross income under this section. Proceeds from the sale of the property that are received after transfer of title and that are unrelated to the modifications made subsequent to the transfer of title are not considered gross proceeds of sale or gross income from the modifications. 2. If the original owner enters into an agreement separate from the contract for sale of the real property providing for amounts to be paid to the original owner for the modifications to be made in the period subsequent to the transfer of title to the property, the amounts are included in the original owner's gross proceeds of sale or gross income received for the modifications made subsequent to the transfer of title. 3. If the original owner is responsible to the new owner for modifications made to the property in the period subsequent to the transfer of title and derives any gross proceeds of sale or gross income from the project subsequent to the transfer of title other than a delayed disbursement from escrow unrelated to the modifications, it is presumed that the amounts are received for the modifications made subsequent to the transfer of title unless the contrary is established by the owner through its books, records and papers kept in the regular course of business. 4. The tax base of the original owner is computed in the same manner as a prime contractor under this section. S. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Alteration" means an activity or action that causes a direct physical change to existing property. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) For existing property that is properly classified as class one property under section 42-12001, paragraph 15, class two property under section 42-12002, paragraph 1, subdivision (c) or paragraph 2, subdivision (c) and that is used for residential purposes, class three property under section 42-12003 or class four property under section 42-12004, this paragraph does not apply if the contract amount is more than twenty-five percent of the most recent full cash value established under chapter 13, article 2 of this title as of the date of any bid for the work or the date of the contract, whichever value is higher. (b) For all existing property other than existing property described in subdivision (a) of this paragraph, this paragraph does not apply if the contract amount is more than $750,000. (c) Project elements may not be artificially separated from a contract to cause a project to qualify as an alteration. The department has the burden of proof that project elements have been artificially separated from a contract. (d) If a project for which the owner and the person performing the work reasonably believed, at the inception of the contract, would be treated as an alteration under this paragraph and, on completion of the project, the project exceeded the applicable threshold described in either subdivision (a) or (b) of this paragraph by not more than twenty-five percent of the applicable threshold for any reason, the work performed under the contract qualifies as an alteration. (e) A change order that directly relates to the scope of work of the original contract shall be treated as part of the original contract, and the contract amount shall include any amount attributable to a change order that directly relates to the scope of work of the original contract. (f) Alteration does not include maintenance, repair or replacement. 2. "Contracting" means engaging in business as a contractor. 3. "Contractor" is synonymous with the term "builder" and means any person or organization that undertakes to or offers to undertake to, or purports to have the capacity to undertake to, or submits a bid to, or does personally or by or through others, modify any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation, manufactured building or other structure, project, development or improvement, or to do any part of such a project, including the erection of scaffolding or other structure or works in connection with such a project, and includes subcontractors and specialty contractors. For all purposes of taxation or deduction, this definition shall govern without regard to whether or not such a contractor is acting in fulfillment of a contract. 4. "Manufactured building" means a manufactured home, mobile home or factory-built building, as defined in section 41-4001. 5. "Manufactured building dealer" means a dealer who either: (a) Is licensed pursuant to title 41, chapter 37, article 4 and who sells manufactured buildings to the final consumer. (b) Supervises, performs or coordinates the excavation and completion of site improvements or the setup of a manufactured building, including the contracting, if any, with any subcontractor or specialty contractor for the completion of the contract. 6. "Modification" means construction, grading and leveling ground, wreckage or demolition. Modification does not include: (a) Any project described in subsection P of this section. (b) Any wreckage or demolition of existing property, or any other activity that is a necessary component of a project described in subsection P of this section. (c) Any mobilization or demobilization related to a project described in subsection P of this section, such as the erection or removal of temporary facilities to be used by those persons working on the project. 7. "Modify" means to make a modification or cause a modification to be made. 8. "Owner" means the person that holds title to the real property or improvements to real property that is the subject of the work, as well as an agent of the title holder and any person with the authority to perform or authorize work on the real property or improvements, including a tenant and a property manager. For the purposes of subsection P of this section, a person who is hired by a general contractor that is hired by an owner, or a subcontractor of a general contractor that is hired by an owner, is considered to be hired by the owner. 9. "Prime contracting" means engaging in business as a prime contractor. 10. "Prime contractor" means a contractor who supervises, performs or coordinates the modification of any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation, manufactured building or other structure, project, development or improvement, including the contracting, if any, with any subcontractors or specialty contractors and who is responsible for the completion of the contract. Except as provided in subsections E and R of this section, a person who owns real property, who engages one or more contractors to modify that real property and who does not itself modify that real property is not a prime contractor within the meaning of this paragraph regardless of the existence of a contract for sale or the subsequent sale of that real property. 11. "Replacement" means the removal from service of one component or system of existing property or tangible personal property installed in existing property, including machinery or equipment, and the installation of a new component or system or new tangible personal property, including machinery or equipment, that provides the same, a similar or an upgraded design or functionality, regardless of the contract amount and regardless of whether the existing component or system or existing tangible personal property is physically removed from the existing property. 12. "Sale of a used manufactured building" does not include a lease of a used manufactured building. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 42-5076, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5076. Online lodging marketplace classification; definitions A. The online lodging marketplace classification is comprised of the business of operating an online lodging marketplace. B. The tax base for the online lodging marketplace classification is the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the business measured by the total amount charged for an online transient lodging transaction by the online lodging operator. C. Through December 31, 2018, the online lodging marketplace classification does not include any online lodging marketplace that has not entered into an agreement with the department to register for, or has not otherwise obtained from the department, a license to collect tax pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection L. D. The tax base for the online lodging marketplace classification does not include the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from charges to an occupant who is a transient as defined in section 42-5070 for the occupancy of any lodging accommodation in this state that is classified for property tax purposes under section 42-12001. E. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Online lodging marketplace" means a person that provides a digital platform for compensation through which an unaffiliated third party offers to rent lodging accommodations in this state to an occupant, including a transient, as defined in section 42-5070, and the accommodations are not classified for property tax purposes under section 42-12001, paragraph 15 or section 42-12003 or 42-12004. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Lodging accommodations" means any space offered to the public for lodging, including any hotel, motel, inn, tourist home or house, dude ranch, resort, campground, studio or bachelor hotel, lodging house, rooming house, residential home, apartment house, dormitory, public or private club, mobile home or house trailer at a fixed location in this state or other similar structure or space. (b) "Unaffiliated third party" means a person that is not owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the same interests. 2. "Online lodging operator" means a person that is engaged in the business of renting to an occupant, including a transient as defined in section 42-5070, any lodging accommodation in this state offered through an online lodging marketplace. 3. "Online lodging transaction" means a charge to an occupant, including a transient as defined in section 42-5070, by an online lodging operator for the occupancy of any lodging accommodation in this state and includes an online transient lodging transaction. 4. "Online transient lodging transaction" means a charge to an occupant who is a transient as defined in section 42-5070 by an online lodging operator for the occupancy of any lodging accommodation in this state. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 42-12001, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-12001. Class one property For the purposes of taxation, class one is established consisting of the following subclasses: 1. Producing mines and mining claims, personal property used on mines and mining claims, improvements to mines and mining claims and mills and smelters operated in conjunction with mines and mining claims that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14053. 2. Standing timber that is valued at full cash value. 3. Real and personal property of gas distribution companies, electric transmission companies, electric distribution companies, combination gas and electric transmission and distribution companies, and companies engaged in the generation of generating electricity that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14151. 4. Real and personal property of airport fuel delivery companies that are valued pursuant to section 42-14503. 5. Real and personal property that is used by producing oil, gas and geothermal resource interests that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14102. 6. Real and personal property of water, sewer and wastewater utility companies that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14151. 7. Real and personal property of pipeline companies that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14201. 8. Real and personal property of shopping centers that are valued at full cash value or pursuant to chapter 13, article 5 of this title, as applicable, other than property that is included in class nine. 9. Real and personal property of golf courses that are valued at full cash value or pursuant to chapter 13, article 4 of this title. 10. All property, both real and personal, of manufacturers, assemblers or fabricators, other than property that is specifically included in another class described in this article, that is valued under this title. 11. Real and personal property that is used in communications transmission facilities and that provides public telephone or telecommunications exchange or interexchange access for compensation to effect two-way communication to, from, through or within this state. 12. Real property and improvements that are devoted to any other commercial or industrial use, other than property that is specifically included in another class described in this article, and that are valued at full cash value. 13. Personal property that is devoted to any other commercial or industrial use, other than property that is specifically included in another class described in this article, and that is valued at full cash value. 14. Real and personal property of electric cooperatives that are valued at full cash value pursuant to section 42-14159. 15. Real and personal property and improvements to the property that are used for residential purposes and are all of the following: (a) owned by a corporation or a limited liability company or an affiliate of the corporation OR the limited liability company that owns more than fifty properties in the county. (b) solely leased or rented, including leased or rented to lodgers. (c) not included in class two, three, four, six, seven or eight. (d) valued at full cash value. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 42-12054, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-12054. Change in classification of owner-occupied residence A. If a person purchases or converts property that is listed as class one pursuant to section 42-12001, paragraph 12, or 13 or 15, class two or class four pursuant to article 1 of this chapter and occupies the property as the person's primary residence, the person may have the classification reviewed for change to class three from the date of conversion and occupancy as a primary residence and may appeal from the decision resulting from the review in the same manner as provided by law for review of a valuation for ad valorem property taxes and appeal from that review. B. If a person purchases or converts property that is listed as class one pursuant to section 42-12001, paragraph 12, or 13 or 15, class two or class four pursuant to article 1 of this chapter and the property is occupied by a member of the owner's immediate family as described in section 42-12053, the person may have the classification reviewed for change to class three from the date of occupancy and may appeal the decision resulting from the review in the same manner as provided by law for review of a valuation for ad valorem property taxes and appeal from that review. C. If a person makes such a conversion or occupancy or appeals the classification after the county assessor has closed the rolls, the person may petition the county board of supervisors to change the classification and reduce the assessed valuation from the date of conversion or occupancy. D. The board of supervisors shall entertain the petition in the same manner as a board of equalization hears a request for reduction in valuation. E. The petitioner may appeal the board of supervisors' decision in the same manner as provided in section 42-16111, except that the petitioner shall file the notice of appeal within fifteen days after the board's finding. F. If the board of supervisors finds that the property is in fact the owner's primary residence and should be listed as class three property, the board shall change the classification on the roll and fix the assessed valuation from the date of occupancy. The amount of taxes that is assessed against the property shall be computed by applying the current tax rate to the original assessed valuation prorated for the portion of the tax year before the property was occupied plus the current tax rate applied to the reassessed value of the property prorated for the balance of the year. G. The board of supervisors shall notify the department, assessor and county treasurer of the change in classification, the change in assessed valuation and the amount of tax assessed. The department and the assessor may appeal any such decision in the same manner as provided in section 42-16111. The assessor and treasurer shall note the change on their records, and the treasurer may issue a future tax credit, endorsed by the board, to the person whose property is liable for the tax. The tax credit shall be used on the next or several succeeding property tax assessments that the person may owe thereafter. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 42-12056, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-12056. Renewable energy systems valuation; definition A. For properties THAT are subject to this chapter and that are class one as prescribed in section 42-12001, paragraph 15, class three as defined prescribed in section 42-12003 or class four as defined prescribed in section 42-12004, renewable energy systems and any other device or system designed primarily for the production of to produce renewable energy in which the majority of the energy is consumed on-site,  are considered to add no value to the property. B. For the purposes of this section, "renewable energy systems" means electric generation systems and electric transmission and distribution systems that is are used or useful for the generation, storage, transmission generating, storing, transmitting or distribution of distributing electric power, energy or fuel derived from solar, wind or other nonpetroleum renewable sources, including materials and supplies.END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Title 42, chapter 11, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 42-11134, to read: START_STATUTE42-11134. Exemption for primary residences; affidavit A. Residential property that is not subject to a mortgage, deed of trust or other similar encumbrance and that is owned by a person who is at least sixty-two years of age and who has occupied the property as the person's primary residence for at least the two years prior to claiming the exemption is exempt from taxation. B. The owner of the property shall initially establish qualification for exemption under this section by filing an affidavit with the county assessor under section 42-11152.  Thereafter, the owner is not required to file an affidavit under section 42-11152 unless: 1. The property is no longer, or will not be, used as the owner's primary residence. 2. Any interest in the title to the property is conveyed to a new owner.END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Applicability Sections 42-5075, 42-5076, 42-12001, 42-12054 and 42-12056, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, apply to tax years beginning from and after December 31, 2026. Sec. 8. Conditional enactment Section 42-11134, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, does not become effective unless the Constitution of Arizona is amended by a vote of the people at the next general election by passage of House Concurrent Resolution ______, fifty-seventh legislature, second regular session, relating to property tax exemptions.